South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3968.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 29 Protect South Carolina's Citizens from the Effect of Electromagnetic Pulse Section 1-1-1800.  For purposes of this article: (1) "Critical infrastructure" means systems and assets, whether physical or virtual, so vital to this State that the incapacity or destruction of the systems and assets would have a debilitating impact on the security, economic security, or public health or safety, of South Carolina. This includes, but is not limited to, the facilities and assets located in this State belonging to or otherwise associated with the following entities: federal, state, and local governments, public utilities, healthcare, first responders, and public schools. (2) "Electromagnetic pulse" means a burst of electromagnetic energy that has the potential to negatively affect technology systems on Earth and in space. This may include human-made electromagnetic pulses and geomagnetic disturbances from the Sun as seen with the "Aurora Borealis" last spring and fall, and its interaction is measured in nanoseconds, far accelerated beyond that of a lightning strike. Section 1-1-1810.  (A)(1) The South Carolina Emergency Management Division (SCEMD) must provide a detailed outline within their current emergency preparedness plan that includes both steps to be taken to harden critical infrastructure from an electromagnetic pulse or geomagnetic disturbance, as well as alternative energy sources to provide independence for an extended period of time should the grid be incapacitated indefinitely. (2) This plan must be completed and distributed to all municipalities by January 1, 2026. (B) All energy distributors of electrical power in this State, including electrical utilities not within the Public Service Commission's jurisdiction, must offer a program to its residential customers who request electromagnetic pulse protection for their personal assets. This program must allow the customer, if the customer so desires, to have electromagnetic pulse protection installed by the utility and to establish a payment plan through the customer's monthly utility bill. (C) Any municipality or critical infrastructure entity that complies with the plan provided by the SCEMD within one year is eligible for a grant to assist with funding from the General Assembly. SECTION 2.  The General Assembly must provide for multiyear funding beginning in the 2025-2026 Appropriations Act to assist entities with critical infrastructure to obtain and implement electromagnetic pulse protection and alternative power sources. This funding will be awarded in the form of grants through the SCEMD, a division of the Office of the Adjutant General of the South Carolina Guard. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----